Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3567
Hospital district; sinking fund; investment.

Any money in the hands of any treasurer as a sinking fund for the redemption of bonds which are a valid and legal obligation of the hospital district to which such money belongs or for the payment of interest on any such bonds and which is not currently required to retire bonds and pay interest on bonds, shall be invested by the treasurer, when so ordered by the board of directors, in securities authorized as legal investments for counties, school districts or hospital districts. The interest earned on such investments shall be credited to the sinking fund from which the invested funds were drawn.

Laws 1967, c. 109, § 14, p. 355;

R.S.1943, (1987), § 23-343.62.